Louisiana, session 2026, SB375.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1615(A)(4) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
40:1615(A)(5) and (6) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1615. Class B fire fighting foam containing fluorinated organic chemicals;
definitions; use restrictions
A. As used in this Part, the following terms have the meaning ascribed to
them in this Section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(4) "Testing" means calibration testing, conformance testing, or fixed system
testing the evaluation of fire fighting equipment, systems, or foam concentrates
for operability, performance verification, calibration, conformance to
manufacturer specifications, or regulatory compliance including but not limited
to discharge testing of fixed fire suppression systems, mobile apparatus testing,
proportioning system calibrations, and system acceptance testing. "Testing"
does not include emergency fire fighting operations.
(5) "Training" means instruction, drills, exercises, demonstrations, or
other activities conducted to familiarize personnel with the deployment,
handling, storage, mixing, proportioning, or application of fire fighting foam,
including live fire exercises and simulated fire response scenarios. "Training"
does not include emergency fire fighting operations.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 375 ENROLLED
(6) "Emergency fire fighting operation" includes any response to a Class
B fire.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.